Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2847
Medical review panel; not to consider disputed questions of law; adviser to panel.

(1) Medical review panels shall be concerned only with the determination of the questions set forth in section 44-2843. Such panels shall not consider or report on disputed questions of law.

(2) To provide for uniformity of procedure, the Department of Health and Human Services may appoint a doctor of medicine from the members of the Board of Medicine and Surgery who may sit with each panel as an observer and as an adviser on procedure but without a vote.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 47;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 242;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 181.